District of Columbia statutes.
21-2034

Request for notice; interested person.

Upon payment of any required fee, an interested person who desires to be notified before any order is made in any proceeding under this chapter may file a request for notice with the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending. The clerk shall mail a copy of the request to the guardian and to the conservator if either has been appointed. A request is not effective unless it contains a statement showing the interest of the person making it and the address of that person or an attorney to whom notice is to be given. The request is effective only as to proceedings occurring after the filing. Any governmental agency paying or planning to pay benefits to the individual to be protected is an interested person in protective proceedings.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2034.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1-404 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).